en: Chocolates stuffed with almond paste
de: Schokolade mit Mandelcremefüllung
fr: Chocolats fourrés à la pâte d'amande
hr: Čokolade punjene pastom od badema
it: Cioccolato ripieno di impasto alla mandorla
nl: Chocolade met amandelpasta

en: Milk chocolate with dried fruits
bg: Млечен шоколад със сушени плодове
fr: Chocolat au lait aux fruits secs
hr: Mliječna čokolada sa suhim voćem
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su džiovintais vaisiais

en: Milk chocolates with hazelnuts, Milk chocolate with hazelnuts
bg: Млечен шоколад с лешници
de: Milchschokolade mit Haselnüssen
es: Chocolate con leche y avellanas
fi: hasselpähkinämaitosuklaat
fr: Chocolats au lait aux noisettes
he: שוקולד חלב עם אגוזי לוז
hr: Mliječne čokolade s lješnjacima
hu: Tejcsokoládé mogyoróval
it: Cioccolato al latte con nocciole
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su lazdynais, Pieniški šokoladai su lazdyno riešutais
nl: Melkchocolade met hazelnoot
pt: Chocolates de leite com avelãs

en: Milk chocolates with almonds, Milk chocolate with almonds
bg: Млечен шоколад с бадеми
de: Milchschokolade mit Mandeln
es: Chocalte con leche almendrado
fi: Maitosuklaa manteleilla
fr: Chocolats au lait aux amandes
hr: Mliječne čokolade s bademima
hu: Tejes csokoládé mandulával
it: Cioccolato al latte con mandorle
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su migdolais
nl: Melkchocolade met amandelen
pt: Chocolates de leite com amêndoas
sv: Mjölkchoklad med mandlar

en: Milk chocolates with raisins
bg: Млечен шоколад със стафиди
da: Mælkechokolader med rosiner
hr: Mliječne čokolade s grožđicama
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su razinomis
sv: Mjölkchoklader med russin

en: Dark chocolates, dark chocolate
bg: Тъмен шоколад
ca: Xocolata negra
cs: Hořké čokolády
da: Mørke chokolader, Mørk chokolade
de: Bitterschokoladen, Herrenschokoladen, Edelbitterschokoladen, Zartbitterschokoladen, dunkle Schokoladen, schwarze Schokoladen
es: Chocolates negros
fi: tummat suklaat
fr: Chocolats noirs, chocolat noir
he: שוקולד כהה, שוקולד מריר
hr: Tamne čokolade
hu: Feketecsokoládé
it: Cioccolato fondente
ja: ダークチョコレート
lt: Juodi šokoladai, juodas šokoladas
nl: Pure chocolades, Pure chocolade
pl: Czekolada deserowa, czekolada ciemna
pt: Chocolates amargos
ru: Тёмный шоколад
sv: Mörk choklad
th: ดาร์กช็อกโกแลต
tr: Bitter çikolata
zh: 黑巧克力

en: Extra fine dark chocolates, extra fine black chocolates, bitter chocolates
de: Extrafeine dunkle Schokoladen, Herbe Schokoladen
es: Chocolates negros extra finos
fi: Erittäin hienot tummat suklaat
fr: Chocolats noirs extra fin, chocolat noir extra fin, chocolats amers
hr: Ekstra fine tamne čokolade
it: Tavolette di cioccolato fondente extra
lt: Labai juodi šokoladai
nl: Extra fijne pure chocolade
pl: Czekolada gorzka
ru: Горький шоколад, Чёрный шоколад

en: Dark chocolates with sweeteners
bg: Черен шоколад с подсладители
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Süßungsmitteln
es: Chocolates negros con edulcorantes
fi: Tummat suklaat makeutusaineilla
fr: Chocolats noirs aux édulcorants
hr: Tamne čokolade sa zaslađivačima
it: Cioccolato fondente con edulcorante
lt: Juodi šokoladai su saldikliais
nl: Pure chocola met zoetstoffen

en: Dark chocolate bar without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
fr: Chocolat noir en tablette sans sucres ajoutés avec édulcorants
hr: Tamna čokolada bez šećera i s umjetnim sladilima
lt: Juodos šokolado plytelės be cukraus ir su dirbtiniais saldikliais

en: Dark chocolate bar with dried fruits
fr: Chocolat noir en tablette aux fruits secs
hr: Crna čokolada sa suhim voćem
lt: Juodos šokolado plytelės su džiovintais vaisiais

en: Dark chocolates with almonds
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Mandeln
es: Chocolates negros con almendras
fi: Tummat mantelisuklaat
fr: Chocolats noirs aux amandes
hr: Tamne čokolade s bademima
hu: Fekete csokoládék madulával
it: Cioccolato fondente alle mandorle
lt: Juodi šokoladai su migdolais
nl: Pure chocola met amandel
pt: Chocolates negros com amêndoas
ru: Тёмный шоколад с миндалём
sv: Mörk choklad med mandlar, Mörk choklad med mandel

en: Dark chocolates with hazelnuts
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Haselnüssen
es: Chocolates negro con avellanas
fi: Tummat suklaat hasselpähkinöillä
fr: Chocolats noirs aux noisettes
hr: Tamne čokolade s lješnjacima
it: Cioccolato fondente alle nocciole
lt: Juodi šokoladai su lazdynais, Juodi šokoladai su lazdyno riešutais
nl: Pure chocola met hazelnoot
pt: Chocolates negros com avelãs

en: Dark chocolates with raisins
bg: Черен шоколад със стафиди
da: Mørke chokolader med rosiner
fr: Chocolats noirs aux raisins
hr: Tamne čokolade s grožđicama
lt: Juodi šokoladai su razinomis
sv: Mörka choklader med russin

en: Dark chocolates with praline
fr: Chocolats noirs aux pralines

es: Chocolates negro con pistachos
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Pistazien
fr: Chocolats noirs aux pistaches
it: Cioccolato fondente al pistacchio
lt: Juodi šokoladai su pistacijomis

en: Dark chocolates with orange, Dark chocolate bar with orange
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Orange
es: Chocolates negro con naranja
fi: Tummaa suklaata appelsiinilla
fr: Chocolats noirs à l'orange
hr: Tamne čokolade s narančom
it: Cioccolato fondente con arancia, cioccolato fondente all'arancio
lt: Juodi šokoladai su apelsinais, Juodos šokolado plytelės su apelsinais
nl: Pure chocola met sinaasappelschil

en: Dark chocolates with raspberries, Dark chocolate bar with raspberries
fr: Chocolats noirs à la framboise
hr: Tamne čokolade s malinama
lt: Juodi šokoladai su avietėmis, Juodos šokolado plytelės su avietėmis

en: Dark chocolates with pear, Dark chocolate bar with pear
fr: Chocolats noirs à la poire
hr: Tamne čokolade s kruškom
lt: Juodi šokoladai su kriaušėmis, Juodos šokolado plytelės su kriaušėmis

en: Dark chocolate bar with fruits
bg: Черен шоколад с плодове
fr: Chocolats noirs aux fruits
hr: Tamna čokolada s voćem
lt: Juodos šokolado plytelės su vaisiais

en: Chocolate bar with dried fruits
bg: Черен шоколад със сушени плодове
fr: Chocolats aux fruits secs